Utah statutes.
53-10-209.   Penal institutions and state hospital to supply information.
(1)  The warden of the state prison, keeper of any jail or correctional
institution, and superintendent of the state hospital shall forward to the
division:
(a)  the fingerprints and recent photographs of all persons confined in each
institution under criminal commitment;
(b)  information relating to the parole, termination or expiration of
sentence, or any other release of each person from confinement during the
preceding month; and
(c)  a photograph taken near the time of release.
(2)  The adult probation and parole section of the Department of Corrections
shall furnish to the division:
(a)  information relating to the revocation or termination of probation or
parole; and
(b)  upon request, the names, fingerprints, photographs, and other data.
(3)  The chair of the Board of Pardons and Parole shall provide to the
division information regarding the issuance, recall, cancellation, or
modification of any warrant issued by members of the Board of Pardons and
Parole, under Section 77-27-11, within one day of issuance.
(4)  Information provided to the division under this section shall be on forms
designated by the division.
